Utah statutes.
63H-2-403.   Purchaser of an authority bond.

(1)  The following may purchase an authority bond with funds owned or controlled by the purchaser:

(a)  a person;

(b)  a political subdivision of the state;

(c)  another entity; or

(d)  a public or private officer.

(2)  Nothing in this section or Section 63H-2-402 may be construed to relieve a purchaser of an authority bond of a duty to exercise reasonable care in selecting securities.

(3)  The authority may purchase its own authority bond at a price that the board determines.



Enacted by Chapter 378, 2009 General Session

